Mississippi, session 2026, SB2542.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Maternal Health Protection Act." SECTION 2. The Legislature finds that Mississippi consistently faces high maternal mortality rates, with women from rural and low-income communities experiencing the highest risks.  It is the intent of the Legislature to reduce preventable maternal deaths, expand access to timely medical care, strengthen hospital safety standards, and ensure that every mother in Mississippi has access to safe and reliable maternal health services. SECTION 3.  As used in this act, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed herein: (a) "Department" means the Mississippi State Department of Health. (b)  "Maternal health services" means prenatal, labor and delivery, postpartum, mental-health and family-planning services. (c)  "Rural maternity care desert" means any county or area designated by the department as lacking access to obstetric services. SECTION 4. (1)  By January 1, 2027, the department shall ensure that public health programs provide access to a minimum of twelve (12) months of postpartum care, including mental health and substance use treatment. (2)  Public health facilities must guarantee timely postpartum follow-up appointments, including virtual options where appropriate. SECTION 5. (1) A public health facility must adopt and implement evidence-based maternal safety protocols, including, but not limited to, the following: (a)  Hemorrhage management; (b)  Hypertension in pregnancy; and (c)  Emergency obstetric transport procedures. (2)  Public health facilities shall report maternal morbidity data to the department to support prevention efforts. (3)  Beginning on January 1, 2027, the department may issue corrective action plans for public health facilities that fail to implement safety protocols required under subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 6. (1)  The Maternal Mortality Review Committee established under Section 41-112-1 is hereby authorized to: (a)  Review all pregnancy-related deaths within the state; (b)  Identify systemic causes associated with pregnancy-related deaths, including, but not limited to, transportation barriers, rural maternity care deserts, rural access issues and racial disparities; and (c)  Publish an annual report with recommendations for preventing pregnancy-related deaths. (2)  Identifiable patient information reviewed under this section shall be confidential and exempt from public disclosure. SECTION 7. (1)  By January 1, 2027, the department shall establish a Maternal Emergency Transportation Fund to assist with the following: (a)  The development of rapid-response emergency plans for obstetric emergencies by rural counties; and (b)  Agreements between facilities for maternal transfer when higher level care is needed. (2)  Funds may be used for ambulances, telehealth triage equipment and staff training. (3)  The fund shall consist of legislative appropriations, any federal grants related to maternal health and any private contributions. (4)  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into the fund. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.